test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-soqv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - soʼv: # Noun 122 'eng /est suits/fin' - full paradigm
     soʼv+N+Sg+Nom: [soʼv, sov]
     soʼv+N+Sg+Gen: [soʼv, sov]
     soʼv+N+Sg+Par: [soʼvvõ, sovvõ]
     soʼv+N+Sg+Dat: [soʼvvõn, sovvõn]
     soʼv+N+Sg+Ins: [soʼvvõks, sovvõks]
     soʼv+N+Sg+Ill: [soʼvvõ, sovvõ]
     soʼv+N+Sg+Ela: [soʼvstõ, sovstõ]
     soʼv+N+Pl+Nom: [soʼvd, sovd]
     soʼv+N+Pl+Gen: [soʼvd, sovd]
     soʼv+N+Pl+Par: [soʼvḑi, sovḑi]
     soʼv+N+Pl+Dat: [soʼvdõn, sovdõn]
     soʼv+N+Pl+Ins: [soʼvdõks, sovdõks]
     soʼv+N+Pl+Ill: [soʼvži, sovži]
     soʼv+N+Pl+Ela: [soʼvšti, sovšti]
